Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4308
Industrial byproduct, defined.

Industrial byproduct shall mean any industrial waste or byproduct containing calcium or calcium and magnesium in forms that will neutralize soil acidity.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 8.